Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.310

Performance-based grant program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may administer a performance-based grant program that provides funding assistance to public agencies that issue business licenses and that wish to join with the department's business licensing service.

(2) The department may determine among interested grant applicants the order and the amount of the grant. In making grant determinations, consideration must be given, but not limited to, the following criteria: Readiness of the public agency to participate; the number of renewable licenses; and the reduced regulatory impact to businesses subject to licensure relative to the overall investment required by the department.

(3) The department must invite and encourage participation by all Washington city and county governments having interests or responsibilities relating to business licensing.

(4) The total amount of grants provided under this section may not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any one fiscal year.

(5) The source of funds for this grant program is the business license account.

[ 2013 c 144 s 28; 2005 c 201 s 1.]